Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.930

Chapter alternative method.

This chapter shall not repeal, amend, or modify any other law providing for planning methods but shall be deemed an alternative method providing for such purpose.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.930. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 93.]